West Virginia, session 2025, SB309.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Office of Technology. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-6-4 of this code, modified by the Office of Technology to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Office of Technology (telecommunications payments made by state spending units, 163 CSR 05), is authorized.